Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
Colorado Business Corporations

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Records Retention Act", see article 17 of title 6.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

ommercial and

C

orporate Law", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with corporate law, see 64 Den. U. L. Rev. 165 (1987); for article, "Recent Judicial Developments in Delaware Takeover Law", see 19 Colo. Law. 47 (1990); for article, "Choice of Entities in Colorado", see 23 Colo. Law. 293 (1994); for article, "Choice of Entity in Colorado: An Update", see 25 Colo. Law. 3 (Oct. 1996); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article, "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law. 6 (June 2004); for article, "Buying, Selling, and Combining Businesses Under the Colorado Business Corporation Act", see 33 Colo. Law. 73 (Nov. 2004); for article, "Dissenters' Rights: The Colorado Supreme Court Finally Speaks", see 34 Colo. Law. 53 (April 2005); for article, "Piercing the Veil of an LLC or a Corporation", see 39 Colo. Law. 71 (Aug. 2010); for article, "The Long and Winding Road to Public Benefit Corporations in Colorado", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2014); for article, "2021 Amendments to Statutes Governing Colorado Entities: Expanding the Ability to Conduct Business Activities Electronically", see 50 Colo. Law. 24 (Aug.-Sept. 2021).